Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB748.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Litterbug Education.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each student enrolled in a school entity in kindergarten through grade five shall have instruction in litter prevention and awareness.(b) Instruction may be integrated into existing science curricula and may include instructional materials created and developed for students by the Department of Education to assist students in making environmentally sound decisions and understanding the vital role decisions have in preserving the 1234567891011121314151617181920 beauty of this Commonwealth.(c) For purposes of this section, the term "school entity" shall mean a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school or intermediate unit.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0748PN0774 - 2 - 12345